Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-920
Additions; subdivisions; conform to ordinances; streets and alleys; requirements.

The city council of any city of the first class or city of the second class or the board of trustees of any village shall have power to compel the owner of any real property described in section 19-918 in subdividing, platting, or laying out the same to conform to the requirements of the ordinance and to lay out and dedicate the avenues, streets, and alleys in accordance therewith.

Laws 1967, c. 66, § 4, p. 217;

R.R.S.1943, § 16-114.02;

Laws 1975, LB 410, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 87.